Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-606
State Treasurer; oaths; power to administer.

The State Treasurer shall have power to administer all oaths required by law, in matters pertaining to the duties of his office.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 21, p. 26;

R.S.1913, § 5581;

C.S.1922, § 4885;

C.S.1929, § 84-606;

R.S.1943, § 84-606.